Illinois, session 104th, HB1402.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $67,622,000, or so much thereof 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Build Illinois 6Bond Fund to the Capital Development Board for the demolition 7and remediation of the buildings on the site of the former 8Jacksonville Development Center. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102025.